Wyoming statutes. Title 5 Courts
Article 3. Bailiff

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

80 C.J.S. Sheriffs and Constables §§ 50, 51.

§ 5-2-301.
Office created; appointment; term.

There shall be a bailiff
of the supreme court, who shall be appointed by the justices of said
court, and who shall hold his office during the pleasure of said justices.

History.

Laws 1899, ch. 32, § 1; R.S. 1899, § 3391; C.S. 1910, § 898; C.S. 1920, § 1127; R.S. 1931, § 31-124; C.S. 1945, § 1-208; W.S. 1957, § 5-30.

§ 5-2-302.
Powers and duties generally.

It shall be the duty
of said bailiff to attend the sessions of said court and preserve
order therein; and he shall possess authority to execute and serve
summons in error, and other writs and orders, issued out of and under
the seal of said court, and orders issued by the justices of said
court or either of them; and he shall perform such other duties as
may be required of him by said court or the justices thereof.

History.

Laws 1899, ch. 32, § 2; R.S. 1899, § 3392; C.S. 1910, § 899; C.S. 1920, § 1128; R.S. 1931, § 31-125; C.S. 1945, § 1-209; W.S. 1957, § 5-31.

§ 5-2-303.
Fees.

The bailiff of the supreme
court, for serving any summons in error, or order, shall collect and
pay into the state treasury, the same fee which is provided by law
for sheriffs for similar services.

History.

Laws 1899, ch. 32, § 3; R.S. 1899, § 3412; C.S. 1910, § 900; C.S. 1920, § 1129; R.S. 1931, § 31-126; C.S. 1945, § 1-210; W.S. 1957, § 5-32.

Cross references. —

As to all state officers being paid fixed and definite salaries, and for duty of officers to pay all fees collected into the proper treasury, see art. 14, §§ 1 and 2, Wyo. Const.

As to sheriff's fees, see §

18-3-608

.

Editor's notes. —

As enacted, this section read: “For serving any summons in error, or order, by the said bailiff, he ….” The wording change was made by the 1899 compiler.

§ 5-2-304.
Salary.

The bailiff shall receive
an annual salary to be determined by the supreme court which shall
be paid in monthly installments in the same manner as other state
salaries are paid.

History.

Laws 1899, ch. 32, § 4; R.S. 1899, § 3413; Laws 1903, ch. 3, § 1; C.S. 1910, § 901; Laws 1919, ch. 40, § 12; C.S. 1920, § 1130; R.S. 1931, § 31-127; C.S. 1945, § 1-211; Laws 1953, ch. 100, § 1; 1957, ch. 157, § 4; W.S. 1957, § 5-33; Laws 1961, ch. 148, § 4; 1969, ch. 168, § 8; 1973, ch. 162, § 1.